

DISCOURSE ON COLONIALISM


AIMÉ CÉSAIRE

Translated by Joan Pinkham. This version published by Monthly Review
Press: New York and London, 1972. Originally published as _Discours sur
le colonialisme_ by Editions Presence Africaine, 1955.

COPYRIGHT: From a Counter-Racist perspective, this is nothing other than
a mechanism employed by White Supremacists (Racists) that has been
designed to control access to information by non-White people.

CONTENTS

DISCOURSE ON COLONIALISM

AN INTERVIEW WITH AIMÉ CÉSAIRE


DISCOURSE ON COLONIALISM

A civilization that proves incapable of solving the problems it creates
is a decadent civilization.

A civilization that chooses to close its eyes to its most crucial
problems is a stricken civilization.

A civilization that uses its principles for trickery and deceit is a
dying civilization.

The fact is that the so-called European civilization – "Western"
civilization - as it has been shaped by two centuries of bourgeois rule,
is incapable of solving the two major problems to which its existence
has given rise: the problem of the proletariat and the colonial problem;
that Europe is unable to justify itself either before the bar of
"reason" or before the bar of "conscience"; and that, increasingly, it
takes refuge in a hypocrisy which is all the more odious because it is
less and less likely to deceive.

_Europe is indefensible_.

Apparently that is what the American strategists are whispering to each
other.

That in itself is not serious.

What is serious is that "Europe" is morally, spiritually indefensible.

And today the indictment is brought against it not by the European
masses alone, but on a world scale, by tens and tens of millions of men
who, from the depths of slavery, set themselves up as judges.

The colonialists may kill in Indochina, torture in Madagascar, imprison
in Black Africa, crackdown in the West Indies. Henceforth, the colonized
know that they have an advantage over them. They know that their
temporary, "masters" are lying.

Therefore, that their masters are weak.

And since I have been asked to speak about colonization and
civilization, let us go straight to the principal lie which is the
source of all the others.

Colonization and civilization?



In dealing with this subject, the commonest curse is to be the dupe in
good faith of a collective hypocrisy that cleverly misrepresents
problems, the better to legitimize the hateful solutions provided for
them.

In other words, the essential thing here is to see clearly, to think
clearly - that is, dangerously - and to answer clearly the innocent
first question: what, fundamentally, is colonization? To agree on what
it is not: neither evangelization, nor a philanthropic enterprise, nor a
desire to push back the frontiers of ignorance, disease, and tyranny,
nor a project undertaken for the greater glory of God, nor an attempt to
extend the rule of law.

To admit once for all, without flinching at the consequences, that the
decisive actors here are the adventurer and the pirate, the wholesale
grocer and the ship owner, the gold digger and the merchant, appetite
and force, and behind them, the baleful projected shadow of a form of
civilization which, at a certain point in its history, finds itself
obliged, for internal reasons, to extend to a world scale the
competition of its antagonistic economies.

Pursuing my analysis, I find that hypocrisy is of recent date; that
neither Cortez discovering Mexico from the top of the great teocalli,
nor Pizzaro before Cuzco (much less Marco Polo before Cambaluc), claims
that he is the harbinger of a superior order; that they kill; that they
plunder; that they have helmets, lances, cupidities; that the slavering
apologists came later; that the chief culprit in this domain is
Christian pedantry, which laid down the dishonest equations
_Christianity_= _civilization_, _paganism_= _savagery_, from which there
could not but ensue abominable colonialist and racist consequences,
whose victims were to be the Indians, the yellow peoples, and the
Negroes.

That being settled, I admit that it is a good thing to place different
civilizations in contact with each other that it is an excellent thing
to blend different worlds; that whatever its own particular genius may
be, a civilization that withdraws into itself atrophies; that for
civilizations, exchange is oxygen; that the great good fortune of Europe
is to have been a crossroads, and that because it was the locus of all
ideas, the receptacle of all philosophies, the meeting place of all
sentiments, it was the best center for the redistribution of energy.

But then I ask the following question: has colonization really _placed
civilizations in_ _contact_? Or, if you prefer, of all the ways of
_establishing contact_, was it the best?

I answer no.

And I say that between _colonization_ and _civilization_ there is an
infinite distance; that out of all the colonial expeditions that have
been undertaken, out of all the colonial statutes that have been drawn
up, out of all the memoranda that have been dispatched by all the
ministries, there could not come a single human value.

First we must study how colonization works to _decivilize_ the
colonizer, to _brutalize_ him in the true sense of the word, to degrade
him, to awaken him to buried instincts, to covetousness, violence, race
hatred, and moral relativism; and we must show that each time a head is
cut off or an eye put out in Vietnam and in France they accept the fact,
each time a little girl is raped and in France they accept the fact,
each time a Madagascan is tortured and in France they accept the fact,
civilization acquires another dead weight, a universal regression takes
place, a gangrene sets in, a center of infection begins to spread; and
that at the end of all these treaties that have been violated, all these
lies that have been propagated, all these punitive expeditions that have
been tolerated, all these prisoners who have been tied up and
"interrogated, all these patriots who have been



tortured, at the end of all the racial pride that has been encouraged,
all the boastfulness that has been displayed, a poison has been
instilled into the veins of Europe and, slowly but surely, the continent
proceeds toward _savagery_.

And then one fine day the bourgeoisie is awakened by a terrific reverse
shock: the gestapos are busy, the prisons fill up, the torturers around
the racks invent, refine, discuss.

People are surprised, they become indignant. They say: "How strange! But
never mind-it's Nazism, it will. pass!" And they wait, and they hope;
and they hide the truth from themselves, that it is barbarism, but the
supreme barbarism, the crowning barbarism that sums up all the daily
barbarisms; that it is Nazism, yes, but that before they were its
victims, they were its accomplices; that they tolerated that Nazism
before it was inflicted on them, that they absolved it, shut their eyes
to it, legitimized it, because, until then, it had been applied only to
non-European peoples; that they have cultivated that Nazism, that they
are responsible for it, and that before engulfing the whole of Western,
Christian civilization in its reddened waters, it oozes, seeps, and
trickles from every crack.

Yes, it would be worthwhile to study clinically, in detail, the steps
taken by Hitler and Hitlerism and to reveal to the very distinguished,
very humanistic, very Christian bourgeois of the twentieth century that
without his being aware of it, he has a Hitler inside him, that Hitler
_inhabits_ him, that Hitler is his _demon_, that if he rails against
him, he is being inconsistent and that, at bottom, what he cannot
forgive Hitler for is not _crime_ in itself, _the crime against man_, it
is not _the humiliation of man as such_, it is the crime against the
white man, the humiliation of the white man, and the fact that he
applied to Europe colonialist procedures which until then had been
reserved exclusively for the Arabs of Algeria, the coolies of India, and
the blacks of Africa.

And that is the great thing I hold against pseudo-humanism: that for too
long it has diminished the rights of man, that its concept of those
rights has been - and still is - narrow and fragmentary, incomplete and
biased and, all things considered, sordidly racist.

I have talked a good deal about Hitler. Because he deserves it: he makes
it possible to see things on a large scale and to grasp the fact that
capitalist society, at its present stage, is incapable of establishing a
concept of the rights of all men, just as it has proved incapable of
establishing a system of individual ethics. Whether one likes it or not,
at the end of the blind alley that is Europe, I mean the Europe of
Adenauer, Schuman, Bidault, and a few others, there is Hitler. At the
end of capitalism, which is eager to outlive its day, there is Hitler.
At the end of formal humanism and philosophic renunciation, there is
Hitler.

And this being so, I cannot help thinking of one of his statements: "We
aspire not to equality but to domination. The country of a foreign race
must become once again a country of serfs, of agricultural laborers, or
industrial workers. It is not a question of eliminating the inequalities
among men but of widening them and making them into a law."

That rings clear, haughty, and brutal and plants us squarely in the
middle of howling savagery. But let us come down a step.

Who is speaking? I am ashamed to say it: it is the Western _humanist_,
the "idealist" philosopher. That his name is Renan is an accident. That
the passage is taken from a book entitled _La Refonne intellectuelle et
morale_, that it was written in France just after a war which France had
represented as a war of right against might, tells us a great deal about
bourgeois morals.



The regeneration of the inferior or degenerate races by the superior
races is part of the providential order of things for humanity. With us,
the common man is nearly always a declasse nobleman, his heavy hand is
better suited to handling the sword than the menial tool. Rather than
work, he chooses to fight, that is, he returns to, his first estate.
_Regere imperio populos_, that is our vocation. Pour forth this
all-consuming activity onto countries which, like China, are crying
aloud for foreign conquest. Turn the adventurers who disturb European
society into a _ver sacrum_, a horde like those of the Franks, the
Lombards, or the Normans, and every man will be in his right role.
Nature has made a race of workers, the Chinese race, who have wonderful
manual dexterity and almost no sense of honor; govern them with justice,
levying from them, in return for the blessing of such a government, an
ample allowance for the conquering race, and they will be satisfied; a
race of tillers of the soil, the Negro; treat him with kindness and
humanity, and all will be as it should; a race of masters and soldiers,
the European race. Reduce this noble race to working in the _ergastulum_
like Negroes and Chinese, and they rebel. In Europe, every rebel is,
more or less, a soldier who has missed his calling, a creature made for
the heroic life, before whom you are setting _a task that is contrary to
his race_ - a poor worker, too good a soldier. But the life at which our
workers rebel would make a Chinese or a fellah happy, as they are not
military creatures in the least. _Let each one do what he is made for,_
_and all will be well_.

Hitler? Rosenberg? No, Renan.

But let us come down one step further. And it is the long-winded
politician. Who protests? No one, so far as I know, when M. Albert
Sarraut, the former governor-general of Indochina, holding forth to the
students at the Ecole Coloniale, teaches them that it would be puerile
to object to the European colonial enterprises in the name of "an
alleged right to possess the land one occupies, and some sort of right
to remain in fierce isolation, which would leave unutilized resources to
lie forever idle in the hands of incompetents."

And who is roused to indignation when a certain Rev. Barde assures us
that if the goods of this world "remained divided up indefinitely, as
they would be without colonization, they would answer neither the
purposes of God nor the just demands of the human collectivity"?

Since, as his fellow Christian, the Rev. Muller, declares: "Humanity
must not, cannot allow the incompetence, negligence, and laziness of the
uncivilized peoples to leave idle indefinitely the wealth which God has
confided to them, charging them to make it serve the good of all."

No one.

I mean not one established writer, not one academician, not one
preacher, not one crusader for the right and for religion, not one
"defender of the human person."

And yet, through the mouths of the Sarrauts and the Bardes, the Mullers
and the Renans, through the mouths of all those who considered - and
consider - it lawful to apply to non-European peoples "a kind of
expropriation for public purposes" for the benefit of nations that were
stronger and better equipped, it was already Hitler speaking!

What am I driving at? At this idea: that no one colonizes innocently,
that no one colonizes with impunity either; that a nation which
colonizes, that a civilization which justifies colonization - and
therefore force - is already a sick civilization, a civilization that is
morally diseased, that irresistibly, progressing from one consequence to
another, one repudiation to another, calls for its Hitler, I mean its
punishment.



Colonization: bridgehead in a campaign to civilize barbarism, from which
there may emerge at any moment the negation of civilization, pure and
simple.

Elsewhere I have cited at length a few incidents culled from the history
of colonial expeditions.

Unfortunately, this did not find favor with everyone. It seems that I
was pulling old skeletons out of the closet.

Indeed!

Was there no point in quoting Colonel de Montagnac, one of the
conquerors of Algeria: "In order to banish the thoughts that sometimes
besiege me, I have some heads cut off, not the heads of artichokes but
the heads of men."

Would it have been more advisable to refuse the floor to Count
d'Herisson: "It is true that we are bringing back a whole barrelful of
ears collected, pair by pair, from prisoners, friendly or enemy."

Should I have refused Saint-Arnaud the right to profess his barbarous
faith: "We lay waste, we burn, we plunder, we destroy the houses and the
trees." Should I have prevented Marshal Bugeaud from systematizing all
that in a daring theory and invoking the precedent of famous ancestors:
"We must have a great invasion of Africa, like the invasions of the
Franks and the Goths."

Lastly, should I have cast back into the shadows of oblivion the
memorable feat of arms of General Gerard and kept silent about the
capture of Ambike, a city which, to tell the truth, had never dreamed of
defending itself: "The native riflemen had orders to kill only the men,
but no-one restrained them; intoxicated by the smell of blood, they
spared not one woman, not one child… At the end of the afternoon, the
heat caused a light mist to arise: it was the blood of the five thousand
victims, the ghost of the city, evaporating in the setting sun."

Yes or no, are these things true? And the sadistic pleasures, the
nameless delights that send voluptuous shivers and quivers through
Loti's carcass when he focuses his field glasses on a good massacre of
the Annamese? True or not true? 1 And if these things are true, as no
one can deny, will it be said, in order to minimize them, that these
corpses don't prove anything?

For my part, if I have recalled a few details of these hideous
butcheries, it is by no means because I take a morbid delight in them,
but because I think that these heads of men, these collections of ears,
these burned houses, these Gothic invasions, this steaming blood, these
cities that evaporate at the edge of the sword, are not to be so easily
disposed of. They prove that colonization, I repeat, dehumanizes even
the most civilized man; that colonial activity, colonial enterprise,
colonial conquest, which is based on contempt for the native and
justified by that contempt, inevitably tends to change him who
undertakes it; that the colonizer, who in order to ease his conscience
gets into the habit of seeing the other man as an animal, accustoms
himself to treating him like an animal, and tends objectively to
transform _himself_ into an animal. It is this result, this boomerang
effect of colonization that I wanted to point out.

1 This is a reference to the account of the taking of Thuan-An which
appeared in _Le Figaro_ in September 1883 and is quoted in N. Serban's
book, _Loti, sa vie, son oeuvre_. "Then the great slaughter had begun.
They had fired in double-salvos! and it was a pleasure to see these
sprays of bullets, that were so easy to aim, come down on them twice a
minute, surely and methodically, on command… We saw some who were quite
mad and stood up seized with a dizzy desire to run… They zigzagged,
running every which way in this race with death, holding their garments
up around their waists in a comical way . . . and then we amused
ourselves counting the dead, etc."



Unfair? No. There was a time when these same facts were a source of
pride, and when, sure of the morrow, people did not mince words. One
last quotation; it is from a certain Carl Siger, author of an _Essai sur
la colonisation_ (Paris, 1907): The new countries offer a vast field for
individual, violent activities which, in the metropolitan countries,
would run up against certain prejudices, against a sober and orderly
conception of life, and which, in the colonies, have greater freedom to
develop and, consequently, to affirm their worth.

Thus to a certain extent the colonies can serve as a safety valve for
modern society. Even if this were their only value, it would be immense.

Truly, there are stains that it is beyond the power of man to wipe out
and that can never be fully expiated.

But let us speak about the colonized.

I see clearly what colonization has destroyed: the wonderful Indian
civilizations - and neither Deterding nor Royal Dutch nor Standard Oil
will ever console me for the Aztecs and the Incas.

I see clearly the civilizations; condemned to perish at a future date,
into which it has introduced a principle of ruin: the South Sea islands,
Nigeria, Nyasaland. I see less clearly the contributions it has made.

Security? Culture? The rule of law? In the meantime, I look around and
wherever there are colonizers and colonized face to face, I see force,
brutality, cruelty, sadism, conflict, and, in a parody of education, the
hasty manufacture of a few thousand subordinate functionaries, "boys,"
artisans, office clerks, and interpreters necessary for the smooth
operation of business.

I spoke of contact.

Between colonizer and colonized there is room only for forced labor,
intimidation, pressure, the police, taxation, theft, rape, compulsory
crops, contempt, mistrust, arrogance, self-complacency, swinishness,
brainless elites, degraded masses.

No human contact, but relations of domination and submission which turn
the colonizing man into a class-room monitor, an army sergeant, a prison
guard, a slave driver, and the indigenous man into an instrument of
production.

My turn to state an equation: colonization = "thing-ification."

I hear the storm. They talk to me about progress, about "achievements,"
diseases cured, improved standards of living.

_I_ am talking about societies drained of their essence, cultures
trampled underfoot, institutions undermined, lands confiscated,
religions smashed, magnificent artistic creations destroyed,
extraordinary _possibilities_ wiped out.

They throw facts at my head, statistics, mileages of roads, canals, and
railroad tracks.

_I_ am talking about thousands of men sacrificed to the Congo-Ocean2. I
am talking about those who, as I write this, are digging the harbor of
Abidjan by hand. I am talking about millions of men torn from their
gods, their land, their habits, their life-from life, from the dance,
from wisdom.

2 A railroad line connecting Brazzaville with the port of Pointe-Noire.
(Trans.)



I am talking about millions of men in whom fear has been cunningly
instilled, who have been taught to have an inferiority complex, to
tremble, kneel, despair, and behave like flunkeys.

They dazzle me with the tonnage of cotton or cocoa that has been
exported, the acreage that has been planted with olive trees or
grapevines.

_I_ am talking about natural _economies_ that have been disrupted -
harmonious and viable economies adapted to the indigenous population -
about food crops destroyed, malnutrition permanently introduced,
agricultural development oriented solely toward the benefit of the
metropolitan countries, about the looting of products, the looting of
raw materials.

They pride themselves on abuses eliminated.

I too talk about abuses, but what I say is that on the old ones - very
real - they have superimposed others - very detestable. They talk to me
about local tyrants brought to reason; but I note that in general the
old tyrants get on very well with the new ones, and that there has been
established between them, to the detriment of the people, a circuit of
mutual services and complicity.

They talk to me about civilization. I talk about proletarianization and
mystification.

For my part, I make a systematic defense of the non-European
civilizations.

Every day that passes, every denial of justice, every beating by the
police, every demand of the workers that is drowned in blood, every
scandal that is hushed tip, every punitive expedition, every police van,
every gendarme and every militiaman, brings home to us the value of our
old societies.

They were communal societies, never societies of the many for the few.

They were societies that were not only ante-capitalist, as has been
said, but also _anti-capitalist_.

They were democratic societies, always.

They were cooperative societies, fraternal societies.

I make a systematic defense of the societies destroyed by imperialism.

They were the fact, they did not pretend to be the idea; despite their
faults, they were neither to be hated nor condemned. They were content
to be. In them, neither the word _failure_ nor the word _avatar_ had any
meaning. They kept hope intact.

Whereas those are the only words that can, in all honesty, be applied to
the European enterprises outside Europe. My only consolation is that
periods of colonization pass, that nations sleep only for a time, and
that peoples remain.

This being said, it seems that in certain circles they pretend to have
discovered in me an "enemy of Europe" and a prophet of the return to the
ante-European past.

For my part, I search in vain for the place where I could have expressed
such views; where I ever underestimated the importance of Europe in the
history of human thought; where I ever preached a _return_ of any kind;
where I ever claimed that there could be a _return_.

The truth is that I have said something very different: to wit, that the
great historical tragedy of Africa has beennot so much that it was too
late in making contact with the rest of the world, as the manner in
which that contact was brought about; that Europe began to "propagate"
at a time when it had fallen into the hands of the most unscrupulous
financiers and captains of industry; that it was our misfortune to
encounter that particular Europe on



our path, and that Europe is responsible before the human community for
the highest heap of corpses in history.

In another connection, in judging colonization, I have added that Europe
has gotten on very well indeed with all the local feudal lords who
agreed to serve, woven a villainous complicity with them, rendered their
tyranny more effective and more efficient, and that it has actually
tended to prolong artificially the survival of local pasts in their most
pernicious aspects.

I have said - and this is something very different - that colonialist
Europe has grafted modern abuse onto ancient injustice, hateful racism
onto old inequality.

That if I am attacked on the grounds of intent, I maintain that
colonialist Europe is dishonest in trying to justify its colonizing
activity _a posteriori_ by the obvious material progress that has been
achieved in certain fields under the colonial regime - since _sudden_
_change_ is always possible, in history as elsewhere; since no one knows
at what stage of material development these same countries would have
been if Europe had not intervened; since the technical outfitting of
Africa and Asia, their administrative reorganization, in a word, their
"Europeanization," was (as is proved by the example of Japan) in no way
tied to the European _occupation_; since the Europeanization of the
non-European continents could have been accomplished otherwise than
under the heel of Europe; since this movement of Europeanization _was in
progress_; since it was even slowed down; since in any case it was
distorted by the European takeover.

The proof is that at present it is the indigenous peoples of Africa and
Asia who are demanding schools, and colonialist Europe which refuses
them; that it is the African who is asking for ports and roads, and
colonialist Europe which is niggardly on this score; that it is the
colonized man who wants to move forward, and the colonizer who holds
things back.

To go further, I make no secret of my opinion that at the present time
the barbarism of Western Europe has reached an incredibly high level,
being only surpassed - far surpassed, it is true - by the barbarism of
the United States.

And I am not talking about Hitler, or the prison guard, or the
adventurer, but about the "decent fellow" across the way; not about the
member of the SS, or the gangster, but about the respectable bourgeois.
In a time gone by, Leon Bloy innocently became indignant over the fact
that swindlers, perjurers, forgers, thieves, and procurers were given
the responsibility of "bringing to the Indies the example of Christian
virtues."

We've made progress: today it is the possessor of the "Christian
virtues" who intrigues - with no small success - for the honor of
administering overseas territories according to the methods of forgers
and torturers.

A sign that cruelty, mendacity, baseness, and corruption have sunk deep
into the soul of the European bourgeoisie.

I repeat that I am not talking about Hitler, or the SS, or pogroms, or
summary executions. But about a reaction caught unawares, a reflex
permitted, a piece of cynicism tolerated. And if evidence is wanted, I
could mention a scene of cannibalistic hysteria that I have been
privileged to witness in the French National Assembly.

By Jove, my dear colleagues (as they say), I take off my hat to you (a
cannibal's hat, of course).

Think of it! Ninety thousand dead in Madagascar! Indochina trampled
underfoot, crushed to bits, assassinated, tortures brought back from the
depths of the Middle Ages!



And what a spectacle! The delicious shudder that roused the dozing
deputies. The wild uproar! Bidault, looking like a communion wafer
covered with shit - unctuous and sanctimonious cannibalism; Moutet - the
cannibalism of shady deals and sonorous nonsense; Coste-Floret - the
cannibalism of an unlicked bear cub, a blundering fool.

Unforgettable, gentlemen! With fine phrases as cold and solemn as a
mummy's wrappings they tie up the Madagascan. With a few conventional
words they stab him for you. The time it takes to wet your whistle, and
they disembowel him for you. Fine work!

Not a drop of blood will be wasted.

The ones who drink it to the last drop, never adding any water. The ones
like Ramadier, who smear their faces with it in the manner of Silenus3;
Fontlup-Esperaber4 who starches his moustache with it, the walrus
moustache of an ancient Gaul; old Desjardins bending over the emanations
from the vat and intoxicating himself with them as with new wine.
Violence! The violence of the weak. A significant thing: it is not the
head of a civilization that begins to rot first. It is the heart.

I admit that as far as the health of Europe and civilization is
concerned, these cries of "Kill! kill!" and "Let's see some blood,"
belched forth by trembling old men and virtuous young men educated by
the Jesuit Fathers, make a much more disagreeable impression on me than
the most sensational bank holdups that occur in Paris.

And that, mind you, is by no means an exception.

On the contrary, bourgeois swinishness is the rule. We've been on its
trail for a century. We listen for it, we take it by surprise, we sniff
it out, we follow it, lose it, find it again, shadow it, and every day
it is more nauseatingly exposed. Oh! the racism of these gentlemen does
not bother me. I do not become indignant over it. I merely examine it. I
note it, and that is all. I am almost grateful to it for expressing
itself openly and appearing in broad daylight, as a sign. A sign that
the intrepid class which once stormed the bastilles is now hamstrung. A
sign that it feels itself to be mortal. A sign that it feels itself to
be a corpse. And when the corpse starts to babble, you get this sort of
thing:

There was only too much truth in this first impulse of the Europeans
who, _in the century of_ _Columbus, refused to recognize as their fellow
men the degraded inhabitants of the new world_…

One cannot gaze upon the savage for an instant without reading the
anathema written, I do not say upon his soul alone, but _even on the
external form of his body_.

And it's signed Joseph de Maistre.

(That's what is ground out by the mystical mill.)

And then you get this:

From the selectionist point of view, I would look upon it as unfortunate
if there should be a very great numerical expansion of the yellow and
black elements, which would be difficult to eliminate. However, if the
society of the future is organized on a dualistic basis, _with a ruling
class of_ _dolichocephalic blonds and a class of inferior race confined
to the roughest labor, it is possible that_ _this latter role would fall
to the yellow and black elements_. In this case, moreover, they would
not be an inconvenience for the dolichocephalic blonds but an advantage…
_It must not be forgotten that_ _[slavery] is no more abnormal than the
domestication of the horse or the ox_. It is therefore possible that it
may reappear in the future in one form or another. It is probably even
inevitable that this will 3 In classical mythology Silenus was a satyr,
the son of Pan. He was the foster-father of Bacchus, the god of wine,
and is described as a jolly old man, usually drunk. (Trans.)

4 Not a bad fellow at bottom, as later events proved, but on that day in
an absolute frenzy.



happen if the simplistic solution does not come about instead - that of
a single superior race, leveled out by selection.

That's what is ground out by the scientific mill, and it's signed
Lapouge.

And you also get this (from the literary mill this time):

I know that I must believe myself superior to the poor Bayas of the
Mambere. _I know that I_ _must take pride in my blood_. When a superior
man ceases to believe himself superior, he actually ceases to be
superior… _When a superior race ceases to believe itself a chosen race,
it actually_ _ceases to be a chosen race_.

And it's signed Psichari-soldier-of-Africa.

Translate it into newspaper jargon and you get Faguet:

The barbarian is of the same race, after all, as the Roman and the
Greek. He is a cousin.

The yellow man, the black man, is not our cousin at all. Here there is a
real difference, a real distance, and a very great one: an ethnological
distance. _After all, civilization has never yet been_ _made except by
whites_… If Europe becomes yellow, there will certainly be a regression,
a new period of darkness and confusion, that is, another Middle Ages.

And then lower, always lower, to the bottom of the pit, lower than the
shovel can go, M. Jules Romains, of the Academie Francaise and the
_Revue des Deux Mondes_. (It doesn't matter, of course, that M.
Farigoule changes his name once again and here calls himself Salsette
for the sake of convenience.)5 The essential thing is that M. Jules
Romains goes so far as to write this:

I am willing to carry on a discussion only with people who agree to pose
the following hypothesis: a France that had on its metropolitan soil ten
million blacks, five or six million of them in the valley of the
Garonne. Would our valiant populations of the Southwest never have been
touched by race prejudice? Would there not have been the slightest
apprehension if the question had arisen of turning all powers over to
these Negroes, the sons of slaves? . . I once had opposite me a row of
some twenty pure blacks… I will not even censure our Negroes and
Negresses for chewing gum. I will only note… that this movement has the
effect of emphasizing the jaws, and that the associations which come to
mind evoke the equatorial forest rather than the procession of the
Panathenaea....

The black race has not yet produced, will never produce, an Einstein, a
Stravinsky, a Gershwin.

One idiotic comparison for another: since the prophet of the _Revue des
Deux_ _Mondes_ and other places invites us to draw parallels between
"widely separated" things, may I be permitted, Negro that I am, to think
(no one being master of his free associations) that his voice has less
in common with the rustling of the oak of Dodona - or even the
vibrations of the cauldron - than with the braying of a Missouri ass6.

Once again, I systematically defend our old Negro civilizations: they
were courteous civilizations.

5 Jules Romains is the pseudonym of Louis Farigoule, which he legally
adopted in 1953. Salsette is a character in one of his books, _Salsette
Discovers America_ (1942, translated by Lewis Galantiere). The passage
quoted, however, appears only in the expanded second edition of the
book, published in France in 1950. (Trans.) 6 The responses of the
celebrated Greek oracle at Dodona were revealed in the rustling of the
leaves of a sacred oak tree. The cauldron, a famous treasure of the
temple, consisted of a brass figure holding in its hand a whip made of
chains, which, when agitated by the wind, struck a brass cauldron,
producing extraordinarily prolonged vibrations.

(Trans.)

- 10 -

So the real problem, you say, is to return to them. No, I repeat. We are
not men for whom it is a question of "either-or." For us, the problem is
not to make a utopian and sterile attempt to repeat the past, but to go
beyond. It is not a dead society that we want to revive. We leave that
to those who go in for exoticism. Nor is it the present colonial society
that we wish to prolong, the most putrid carrion that ever rotted under
the sun. It is a new society that we must create, with the help of all
our brother slaves, a society rich with all the productive power of
modern times, warm with all the fraternity of olden days.

For some examples showing that this is possible, we can look to the
Soviet Union.

But let us return to M. Jules Romains:

One cannot say that the petty bourgeois has never read anything. On the
contrary, he has read everything, devoured everything.

Only, his brain functions after the fashion of certain elementary types
of digestive systems. It filters. And the filter lets through only what
can nourish the thick skin of the bourgeois' clear conscience.

Before the arrival of the French in their country, the Vietnamese were
people of an old culture, exquisite and refined. To recall this fact
upsets the digestion of the Banque d'Indochine. Start the forgetting
machine!

These Madagascans who are being tortured today, less than a century ago
were poets, artists, administrators? Shhhhh! Keep your lips buttoned!
And silence falls, silence as deep as a safe! Fortunately, there are
still the Negroes. Ah! the Negroes! Let's talk about the Negroes!

All right, let's talk about them.

About the Sudanese empires? About the bronzes of Benin? Shango
sculpture?

That's all right with me; it will give us a change from all the
sensationally bad art that adorns so many European capitals. About
African music. Why not?

And about what the first explorers said, what they saw… Not those who
feed at the company mangers! But the d'Elbees, the Marchais, the
Pigafettas! And then Frobenius!

Say, you know who he was, Frobenius? And we read together: "Civilized to
the marrow of their bones! The idea of the barbaric Negro is a European
invention."

The petty bourgeois doesn't want to hear any more. With a twitch of his
ears he flicks the idea away.

The idea, an annoying fly.

Therefore, comrade, you will hold as enemies - loftily, lucidly,
consistently - not only sadistic governors and greedy bankers, not only
prefects who torture and colonists who flog, not only corrupt,
check-licking politicians and subservient judges, but likewise and for
the same reason, venomous journalists, goitrous academicians, wreathed
in dollars and stupidity, ethnographers who go in for metaphysics,
presumptuous Belgian theologians, chattering intellectuals born stinking
out of the thigh of Nietzsche, the paternalists, the embracers, the
corrupters, the back-slappers, the lovers of exoticism, the dividers,
the agrarian sociologists, the hoodwinkers, the hoaxers, the hot-air
artists, the humbugs, and in general, all those who, performing their
functions in the sordid division of labor for the defense of Western
bourgeois society, try in divers ways and by infamous diversions to
split up the forces of Progress-even if it means denying the very
possibility of Progress - all of them tools of capitalism, all of them,
openly or secretly, supporters of plundering colonialism, all of them
responsible, all hateful, all slave-traders, all henceforth answerable
for the violence of revolutionary action.

- 11 -

And sweep out all 'the obscurers, all the inventors of subterfuges, the
charlatans and tricksters, the dealers in gobbledygook. And do not seek
to know whether personally these gentlemen are in good or bad faith,
whether personally they have good or bad intentions. Whether personally
- that is, in the private conscience of Peter or Paul - they are or are
not colonialists, because the essential thing is that their highly
problematical subjective good faith is entirely irrelevant to the
objective social implications of the evil work they perform as watchdogs
of colonialism.

And in this connection, I cite as examples (purposely taken from very
different disciplines):

- From Gourou, his book _Les Pays tropicaux_, in which, amid certain
correct observations, there is expressed the fundamental thesis, biased
and unacceptable, that there has never been a great tropical
civilization, that great civilizations have existed only in temperate
climates, that in every tropical country the germ of civilization comes,
and can only come, from some other place outside the tropics, and that
if the tropical countries are not under the biological curse of the
racists, there at least hangs over them, with the same consequences, a
no less effective geographical curse.

- From the Rev. Tempels, missionary and Belgian, his "Bantu philosophy,"
as slimy and fetid as one could wish, but discovered very opportunely,
as Hinduism was discovered by others, in order to counteract the
"communistic materialism" which, it seems, threatens to turn the Negroes
into "moral vagabonds."

- From the historians or novelists of civilization (it's the same thing)
- not from this one or that one, but from all of them, or almost
all-their false objectivity, their chauvinism, their sly racism, their
depraved passion for refusing to acknowledge any merit in the non-white
races, especially the black-skinned races, their obsession with
monopolizing all glory for their own race.

- From the psychologists, sociologists _et al_., their views on
"primitivism," their rigged investigations, their self-serving
generalizations, their tendentious speculations, their insistence on the
marginal, "separate" character of the non-whites, and-although each of
these gentlemen, in order to impugn on higher authority the weakness of
primitive thought, claims that his own is based on the firmest
rationalism-their barbaric repudiation, for the sake of the cause, of
Descartes' statement, the charter of universalism, that "reason . . . is
found whole and entire in each man," and that "where individuals of the
same species are concerned, there may be degrees in respect of their
accidental qualities, but not in respect of their forms, or natures." 7

But let us not go too quickly. It is worthwhile to follow a few of these
gentlemen.

I shall not dwell upon the case of the historians, neither the
historians of colonization nor the Egyptologists. The case of the former
is too obvious, and as for the latter, the mechanism by which they
delude their readers has been definitively taken apart by Sheikh Anta
Diop in his book _Nations negres et culture_, the most daring book yet
written by a Negro and one which will without question play an important
part in the awakening of Africa. 8

7 From the opening pages of Descartes' _Discours de la methode_, as
translated by Arthur Wollaston in the Penguin edition (1960). (Trans.)

8 See Sheikh Anta Diop, _Nations negres et culture_, published by
Editions Presence Africaine (1955). Herodotus having declared that the
Egyptians were originally only a colony of the Ethiopians, and Diodorus
Siculus having repeated the same thing and aggravated his offense by
portraying the Ethiopians in such a way that no mistake was possible ("
_Plerique omnes_," to quote the Latin translation, " _nigro sunt colore,
facie sima, crispis capillis_," Book III, Section 8),

- 12 -

Let us rather go back. To M. Gourou, to be exact.

Need I say that it is from a lofty height that the eminent scholar
surveys the native populations, which "have taken no part" in the
development of modern science? And that it is not from the effort of
these populations, from their liberating struggle, from their concrete
fight for life, freedom, and culture that he expects the salvation of
the tropical countries to come, but from the good colonizer - since the
law states categorically that "it is cultural elements prepared in
non-tropical regions which ensure and will ensure the progress of the
tropical regions toward a larger population and a higher civilization."

I have said that M. Gourou's book contains some correct observations:
"The tropical environment and the indigenous societies," he writes,
drawing up the balance-sheet on colonization, "have suffered from the
introduction of techniques that are ill adapted to them, from corvees,
porter service, forced labor, slavery, from the transplanting of workers
from one region to another, sudden changes in the biological
environment, and special new conditions that are less favorable."

A fine record! The look on the university rector's face! The look on the
cabinet minister's face when he reads that! Our Gourou has slipped his
leash; now we're in for it; lie's going to tell everything; he's
beginning: "The typical hot countries find themselves faced with the
following dilemma: economic stagnation and protection of the natives or
temporary economic development and regression of the natives." "Monsieur
Gourou, this is very serious! I'm giving you a solemn warning: in this
game it is your career which is at stake." So our Gourou chooses to back
off and refrain from specifying that, if the dilemma exists, it exists
only within the framework of the existing regime; that if this paradox
constitutes an iron law, it is only the iron law of colonialist
capitalism, therefore of a society that is not only perishable but
already in the process of perishing.

What impure and worldly geography!

If there is anything better, it is the Rev. Tempels. Let them plunder
and torture in the Congo, let the Belgian colonizer seize all the
natural resources, let him stamp out all freedom, let him crush all
pride - let him go in peace, the Reverend Father Tempels consents to all
that. But take care! You are going to the Congo? Respect - I do not say
native property (the great Belgian companies might take that as a dig at
them), I do not say the freedom of the natives (the Belgian colonists
might think that was subversive talk), I do not say the Congolese nation
(the Belgian government might take it much amiss) - I say: You are going
to the Congo? Respect the Bantu philosophy!

"It would be really outrageous," writes the Rev. Ternpels, "if the white
educator were to insist on destroying the black man's own, particular
human spirit, which is the only reality that prevents us from
considering him as an inferior being. It would be a crime it was of the
greatest importance to mount a counterattack. That being granted, and
almost all the Western scholars having deliberately set out to tear
Egypt away from Africa, even at the risk of no longer being able to
explain it, there were several ways of accomplishing the task. Gustave
Le Bon's method, blunt brazen assertion: "The Egyptians are Hamites,
that is to say, whites like the Lydians, the Getulians, the Moors, the
Numidians, the Berbers"; Maspero's method, which consists of making a
connection, contrary to all probability, between the Egyptian language
and the Semitic languages, more especially the Hebrew-Aramaic type, from
which follows the conclusion that originally the Egyptians must have
been Semites; Weigall's method, geographical this time, according to
which Egyptian civilization could only have been born in Lower Egypt,
and that from there it passed into Upper Egypt, traveling up the river…
seeing that it could not travel down ( _sic_). The reader will have
understood that the secret reason why this was impossible is that Lower
Egypt is near the Mediterranean, hence near the white populations, while
Upper Egypt is near the country of the Negroes. In this connection, it
is interesting to oppose to Weigall's thesis the views of Scheinfurth (
_Au coeur de l Afrique_, vol. 1) on the origin of the flora and fauna of
Egypt, which he places "hundreds of miles up-river."

- 13 -

against humanity, on the part of the colonizer, to emancipate the
primitive races from that which is valid, from that which constitutes a
kernel of truth in their traditional thought, etc."

What generosity, Father! And what zeal!

Now then, know that Bantu thought is essentially ontological; that Bantu
ontology is based on the truly fundamental notions of a life force and a
hierarchy of life forces; and that for the Bantu the ontological order
which defines the world comes from God9 and, as a divine decree, must be
respected.

Wonderful! Everybody gains: the big companies, the colonists, the
government-everybody except the Bantu, naturally.

Since Bantu thought is ontological, the Bantu only ask for satisfaction
of an ontological nature. Decent wages! Comfortable housing! Food! These
Bantu are pure spirits, I tell you: "What they desire first of all and
above all is not the improvement of their economic or material
situation, but the white man's recognition of and respect for their
dignity as men, their full human value."

In short, you tip your hat to the Bantu life force, you give a wink to
the immortal Bantu soul. And that's all it costs you! You have to admit
you're getting off cheap!

As for the government, why should it complain? Since, the Rev. Tempels
notes with obvious satisfaction, "from their first contact with the
white men, the Bantu considered us from the only point of view that was
possible to them, the point of view of their Bantu philosophy" and "
_integrated us in their hierarchy of life forces at a very high level_."

In other words, arrange it so that the white man, and particularly the
Belgian, and even more particularly Albert or Leopold, takes his place
at the head of the hierarchy of Bantu life forces, and you have done the
trick. You will have brought this miracle to pass: _the Bantu god will
take responsibility for the Belgian colonialist order, and any Bantu
who_ _dares to raise his hand against it will be guilty of sacrilege_.

As for M. Mannoni, in view of his book and his observations on the
Madagascan soul, he deserves to be taken very seriously.

Follow him step by step through the ins and outs of his little conjuring
tricks, and he will prove to you as clear as day that colonization is
based on psychology, that there are in this world groups of men who, for
unknown reasons, suffer from what must be called a dependency complex,
that these groups are psychologically made for dependence; that they
need dependence, that they crave it, ask for it, demand it; that this is
the case with most of the colonized peoples and with the Madagascans in
particular.

Away with racism! Away with colonialism! They smack too much of
barbarism. M. Mannoni has something better: psychoanalysis. Embellished
with existentialism, it gives astonishing results: the most down-at-heel
cliches are re-soled for you and made good as new; the most absurd
prejudices are explained and justified; and, as if by magic, the moon is
turned into green cheese.

But listen to him:

It is the destiny of the Occidental to face the obligation laid down by
the commandment _Thou shalt leave thy father and thy mother_. This
obligation is incomprehensible to the Madagascan.

At a given time in his development, every European discovers in himself
the desire… to break the bonds of dependency, to become the equal of his
father. The Madagascan, never! He does not experience rivalry with the
paternal authority, "manly protest," or Adlerian inferiority-ordeals
through 9 It is clear that I am not attacking the Bantu philosophy here,
but the way in which certain people try to use it for political ends.

- 14 -

which the European must pass and which are like civilized forms… of the
initiation rites by which one achieves manhood…

Don't let the subtleties of vocabulary, the new terminology, frighten
you! You know the old refrain: "The-Negroes-are-big-children." They take
it, they dress it up for you, tangle it up for you. The result is
Mannoni. Once again, be reassured! At the start of the journey it may
seem a bit difficult, but once you get there, you'll see, you will find
all your baggage again. Nothing will be missing, not even the famous
_white man's burden_.

Therefore, give ear: "Through these ordeals" (reserved for the
Occidental), "one triumphs over the infantile fear of abandonment and
acquires freedom and autonomy, which are the most precious possessions
and also the burdens of the Occidental."

And the Madagascan? you ask. A lying race of bondsmen, Kipling would
say. M. Mannoni makes his diagnosis: "The Madagascan does not even try
to imagine such a situation of abandonment… He desires neither personal
autonomy nor free responsibility."

(Come on, you know how it is. These Negroes can't even imagine what
freedom is. They don't want it, they don't demand it. It's the white
agitators who put that into their heads.

And if you gave it to them, they wouldn't know what to do with it.)

If you point out to M. Mannoni that the Madagascans have nevertheless
revolted several times since the French occupation and again recently in
1947, M. Mannoni, faithful to his premises, will explain to you that
that is purely neurotic behavior, a collective madness, a running amok;
that, moreover, in this case it was not a question of the Madagascans'
setting out to conquer real objectives but an "imaginary security,"
which obviously implies that the oppression of which they complain is an
imaginary oppression.

So clearly, so insanely imaginary, that one might even speak of
monstrous ingratitude, according to the classic example of the Fijian
who burns the drying-shed of the captain who has cured him of his
wounds.

If you criticize the colonialism that drives the most peaceable
populations to despair, M. Mannoni will explain to you that after all,
the ones responsible _are not the_ _colonialist whites_ but the
colonized Madagascans. Damn it all, they took the whites for gods and
expected of them everything one expects of the divinity!

If you think the treatment applied to the Madagascan neurosis was a
trifle rough, M. Mannoni, who has an answer for everything, will prove
to you that the famous brutalities people talk about have been very
greatly exaggerated, that it is all neurotic fabrication, that the
tortures were imaginary tortures applied by "imaginary executioners." As
for the French government, it showed itself singularly moderate, since
it was content to arrest the Madagascan deputies, when it should have
sacrificed them, if it had wanted to respect the laws of a healthy
psychology.

I am not exaggerating. It is M. Mannoni speaking:

Treading very classical paths, these Madagascans transformed their
saints into martyrs, their saviors into scapegoats; they wanted to wash
their imaginary sins in the blood of their own gods. They were prepared,
even at this price, or rather _only at this price_, to reverse their
attitude once more. One feature of this dependent psychology would seem
to be that, since no one can serve two masters, one of the two should be
_sacrificed_ to the other. The most agitated of the colonialists in
Tananarive had a confused understanding of the essence of this
psychology of sacrifice, and they demanded their victims. They besieged
the High Commissioner's office, assuring him that if they were granted
the blood of a few innocents, "everyone would be satisfied." This
attitude, disgraceful from a human point of view, was _based on what
was, on the whole, a fairly_

- 15 -

_accurate perception of the emotional disturbances that the population
of the high plateaux was_ _going through_.

Obviously, it is only a step from this to absolving the bloodthirsty
colonialists. M. Mannoni's "psychology" is as "disinterested," as
"free," as M. Gourou's geography or the Rev. Tempels' missionary
theology!

And the striking thing they all have in common is the persistent
bourgeois attempt to reduce the most human problems to comfortable,
hollow notions: the _idea_ of the dependency complex in Mannoni, the
ontological _idea_ in the Rev. Tempels, the _idea_ of "tropicality" in
Gourou. What has become of the Banque d'Indochine in all that? And the
Banque de Madagascar? And the bullwhip? And the taxes? And the handful
of rice to the Madagascan or the _nhaque_? 10 And the martyrs? And the
innocent people murdered? And the blood-stained money piling up in your
coffers, gentlemen? They have evaporated!

Disappeared, intermingled, become unrecognizable in the realm of pale
ratiocinations.

But there is one unfortunate thing for these gentlemen. It is that their
bourgeois masters are less and less responsive to a tricky argument and
are condemned increasingly to turn away from them and applaud others who
are less subtle and more brutal. That is precisely what gives M. Yves
Florenne a chance. And indeed, here, neatly arranged on the tray of the
newspaper _Le Monde_, are his little offers of service. No possible
surprises. Completely guaranteed, with proven efficacy, fully tested
with conclusive results, here we have a form of racism, a French racism
still not very sturdy, it is true, but promising. Listen to the man
himself:

"Our reader" (a teacher who has had the audacity to contradict the
irascible M. Florenne), "… contemplating two young half-breed girls, her
pupils, has _a sense of pride at_ _the feeling that there is a growing
measure of integration with our French family_… Would her response be
the same if she saw, in reverse, France being integrated into the black
family (or the yellow or red, it makes no difference), that is to say,
becoming diluted, disappearing?"

It is clear that for M. Yves Florenne it is blood that makes France, and
the foundations of the nation are biological: "Its people, its genius,
are made of a thousand-year-old equilibrium that is at the same time
vigorous and delicate, and . . . certain alarming disturbances of this
equilibrium coincide with the massive and often dangerous infusion of
foreign blood which it has had to undergo over the last thirty years."

In short, cross-breeding - that is the enemy. No more social crises! No
more economic crises! All that is left are racial crises! Of course,
humanism loses none of its prestige (we are in the Western world), but
let us understand each other:

"It is not by losing itself in the human universe, with its blood and
its spirit, that France will be universal, it is by remaining itself."
That is what the French bourgeoisie has come to, five years after the
defeat of Hitler! And it is precisely in that that its historic
punishment lies: to be condemned, returning to it as though driven by a
vice, to chew over Hitler's vomit.

Because after all, M. Yves Florenne was still fussing over peasant
novels, "dramas of the land," and stories of the evil eye when, with a
far more evil eye than the rustic hero of some tale of witchcraft,
Hitler was announcing:

10 The name given by the French to the people of Indochina (cf. U.S.
"gook"). (Trans.)

- 16 -

"The supreme goal of the People-State is to preserve the original
elements of the race which, by spreading culture, create the beauty and
dignity of a superior humanity."

M. Yves Florenne is aware of this direct descent.

And be is far from being embarrassed by it.

Fine. That's his right.

As it is not our right to be indignant about it.

Because, after all, we must resign ourselves to the inevitable and say
to ourselves, once for all, that the bourgeoisie is condemned to become
every day more snarling, more openly ferocious, more shameless, more
summarily barbarous; that it is an implacable law that every decadent
class finds itself turned into a receptacle into which there flow all
the dirty waters of history; that it is a universal law that before it
disappears, every class must first disgrace itself completely, on all
fronts, and that it is with their heads buried in the dunghill that
dying societies utter their swan songs.

The dossier is indeed overwhelming.

A beast that by the elementary exercise of its vitality spills blood and
sows death - you remember that historically it was in the form of this
fierce archetype that capitalist society first revealed itself to the
best minds and consciences.

Since then the animal has become anemic, it is losing its hair, its hide
is no longer glossy, but the ferocity has remained, barely mixed with
sadism. It is easy to blame it on Hitler. On Rosenberg. On Jünger and
the others. On the SS.

But what about this: "Everything in this world reeks of crime: the
newspaper, the wall, the countenance of man.

Baudelaire said that, before Hitler was born!

Which proves that the evil has a deeper source.

And Isidore Ducasse, Comte de Lautreamont! 11

In this connection, it is high time to dissipate the atmosphere of
scandal that has been created around the _Chants de Maldoror_.

Monstrosity? Literary meteorite? Delirium of a sick imagination? Come,
now! How convenient it is!

The truth is that Lautreamont had only to look the iron man forged by
capitalist society squarely in the eye to perceive the _monster_, the
everyday monster, his hero.

No one denies the veracity of Balzac.

But wait a moment: take Vautrin, let him be just back from the tropics,
give him the wings of the archangel and the shivers of malaria, let him
be accompanied through the streets of Paris by an escort of Uruguayan
vampires and carnivorous ants, and you will have Maldoror. 12

11 Isidore Ducasse - the title Comte de Lautreamont is a pen name - was
a precursor of surrealism who, unknown during his brief lifetime
(1846-1870) had great influence on a later generation of poets. He is
remembered for a single extraordinary work, the _Chants de Maldoror_, a
kind of epic poem in prose whose satanic hero is in violent rebellion
against God and society. The disconnected episodes through which
Maldoror passes are a series of fantastic visions, occasionally mystic
and lyrical, more often grotesque, macabre and erotic, filled with
sadism and vampirism. The work as a whole has the intensity of a
nightmare and seems almost to spring directly from the author's
subconscious. Guy Wernham's English translation (1944) is still
available. (Trans.)

12 Vautrin, who appears in _Le Pere Goriot_ (1834) and other novels, is
the arch-villain of Balzac's _Comedie humaine_. A master criminal living
under the guise of a former tradesman, he is corrupt, unscrupulous and
single-minded in his pursuit of fortune. With cynical insight into
capitalist society, Vautrin sees himself as no more immoral than the
respectable bourgeois of his time. (Trans.)

- 17 -

The setting is changed, but it is the same world, the same man, hard,
inflexible, unscrupulous, fond, if ever a man was, of "the flesh of
other men."

To digress for a moment within my digression, I believe that the day
will come

when, with all the elements gathered together, all the sources analyzed,
all the circumstances of the work elucidated, it will be possible to
give the _Chants de Maldoror_ a materialistic and historical
interpretation which will bring to light an altogether unrecognized
aspect of this frenzied epic, its implacable denunciation of a very
particular form of society, as it could not escape the sharpest eyes
around the year 1865.

Before that, of course, we will have had to clear away the occultist and
metaphysical commentaries that obscure the path; to re-establish the
importance of certain neglected stanzas-for example, that strangest
passage of all, the one concerning the mine of lice, in which we will
consent to see nothing more or less than the denunciation of the evil
power of gold and the hoarding up of money; to restore to its true place
the admirable episode, of the omnibus, and be willing to find in it very
simply what is there, to wit, the scarcely allegorical picture of a
society in which the privileged, comfortably seated, refuse to move
closer together so as to make room for the new arrival. And-be it said
in passing-who welcomes the child who has been callously rejected? The
people! Represented here by the ragpicker. Baudelaire's ragpicker:

Paying no heed to the spies of the cops, his thralls,

He pours his heart out in stupendous schemes.

He takes great oaths and dictates sublime laws,

Casts down the wicked, aids the victims' cause. 13

Then it will be understood, will it not, that the enemy whom Lautreamont
has made _the enemy_, the cannibalistic, brain-devouring "Creator," the
sadist perched on "a throne made of human excrement and gold," the
hypocrite, the debauchee, the idler who "eats the bread of others" and
who from time to time is found dead drunk, "drunk as a bedbug that has
swallowed three, barrels of blood during the night," it will be
understood that it is not beyond the clouds that one must look for that
creator, but that we are more likely to find him in Desfosses' business
directory and on some comfortable executive board!

But let that be.

The moralists can do nothing about it.

Whether one likes it or not, the bourgeoisie, as a class, is condemned
to take responsibility for all the barbarism of history, the tortures of
the Middle Ages and the Inquisition, warmongering and the appeal to the
_raison d'Etat_, racism and slavery, in short everything against which
it protested in unforgettable terms at the time when, as the attacking
class, it was the incarnation of human progress. The moralists can do
nothing about it. There is a law of _progressive dehumanization_ in
accordance with which henceforth on the agenda of the bourgeoisie there
is - there can be - nothing but violence, corruption, and barbarism.

I almost forgot hatred, lying, conceit.

I almost forgot M. Roger Caillois. 14

13 From “Le Vin des chiffonniers" in _Les Fleurs du mal_, as translated
by C. F. Maclntyre. (Trans.) 14 See Roger Caillois, "Illusions a
rebours," _Nouvelle Revue Francaise_, December and January 1955.

- 18 -

Well then: M. Caillois, who from time immemorial has been given the
mission to teach a lax and slipshod age rigorous thought and dignified
style, M. Caillois, therefore, has just been moved to mighty wrath.

Why?

Because of the great betrayal of Western ethnography which, with a
deplorable

deterioration of its sense of responsibility, has been using all its
ingenuity of late to cast doubt upon the overall superiority of Western
civilization over the exotic civilizations.

Now at last M. Caillois takes the field.

Europe has this capacity for raising up heroic saviors at the most
critical moments.

It is unpardonable on our part not to remember M. Massis, who, around
1927, embarked on a crusade for the defense of the West.

We want to make sure that a better fate is in store for M. Caillois,
who, in order to defend the same sacred cause, transforms his pen into a
good Toledo dagger.

What did M. Massis say? He deplored the fact that "the destiny of
Western civilization, and indeed the destiny of man," were now
threatened; that an attempt was being made on all sides "to appeal to
our anxieties, to challenge the claims made for our culture, to call
into question the most essential part of what we possess," and he swore
to make war upon these "disastrous prophets."

M. Caillois identifies the enemy no differently. It is those "European
intellectuals" who for the last fifty years, "because of exceptionally
sharp disappointment and bitterness," have relentlessly "repudiated the
various ideals of their culture," and who by so doing maintain,
"especially in Europe, a tenacious malaise."

It is this malaise, this anxiety, which M. Caillois, for his part, means
to put an end to. 15

And indeed, no personage since the Englishman of the Victorian age has
ever surveyed history with a conscience more serene and less clouded
with doubt.

His doctrine? It has the virtue of simplicity.

That the West invented science. That the West alone knows how to think;
that at the borders of the Western world there begins the shadowy realm
of primitive thinking, which, dominated by the notion of participation,
incapable of logic, is the very model of faulty thinking.

At this point one gives a start. One reminds M. Caillois that the famous
law of participation invented by Levy-Bruhl was repudiated by Levy-Bruhl
himself; that in the evening of his life he proclaimed to the world that
he had been wrong in "trying to define a characteristic that was
peculiar to the primitive mentality so far as logic was concerned"; 15
It is significant that at the very time when M. Caillois was launching
his crusade, a Belgian colonialist review inspired by the government (
_Europe-Afrique_, no. 6, January 1955), was making an absolutely
identical attack on ethnography: "Formerly, the colonizer's fundamental
conception of his relationship to the colonized man was that of a
civilized man to a savage. Thus colonization rested on a hierarchy,
crude no doubt, but firm and clear." It is this hierarchical
relationship that the author of the article, a certain M. Piron, accuses
ethnography of destroying. Like M. Caillois, he blames Michel Leiris and
Claude Levi-Strauss. He reproaches the former for having written, in his
pamphlet _La Question raciale devant la science moderne_: "It is
childish to try to set up a hierarchy of culture." The latter for having
attacked "false evolutionism," because it "tries to suppress the
diversity of cultures, by considering them as stages in a single
development which, starting from the same point, should make them
converge toward the same goal." Mircea Eliade comes in for special
treatment for having dared to write the following: "The European no
longer has natives before him, but interlocutors. It is well to know how
to begin the dialogue; it is indispensable to recognize that there no
longer exists a solution of continuity between the so-called primitive
or backward world and the modern Western world." Lastly, it is for
excessive egalitarianism, for once, that American thinkers are taken to
task-Otto Klineberg, professor of psychology at Columbia University,
having declared: "It is a fundamental error to consider the other
cultures as inferior to our own simply because they are different."
Decidedly, M. Caillois is in good company.

- 19 -

that, on the contrary, he had become convinced that "these minds do not
differ from ours at all from the point of view of logic… Therefore,
[that they] cannot tolerate a formal contradiction any more than we can…
Therefore, [that they] reject as we do, by a kind of mental reflex, that
which is logically impossible." 16

A waste of time! M. Caillois considers the rectification to be null and
void. For M. Caillois, the true Levy-Bruhl can only be the Levy-Bruhl
who says that primitive man talks raving nonsense.

Of course, there remain a few small facts that resist this doctrine. To
wit, the invention of arithmetic and geometry by the Egyptians. To wit,
the discovery of astronomy by the Assyrians. To wit, the birth of
chemistry among the Arabs. To wit, the appearance of rationalism in
Islam at a time when Western thought had a furiously pre-logical cast to
it. But M. Caillois soon puts these impertinent details in their place,
since it is a strict principle that "a discovery which does not fit into
a whole" is, precisely, only a detail, that is to say, a negligible
nothing.

As you can imagine, once off to such a good start, M. Caillois doesn't
stop half way.

Having annexed science, he's going to claim ethics too.

Just think of it! M. Caillois has never eaten anyone! M. Caillois has
never dreamed of finishing off an invalid! It has never occurred to M.
Caillois to shorten the days of his aged parents! Well, there you have
it, the superiority of the West: "That discipline of life which tries to
ensure that the human person is sufficiently respected so that it is not
considered normal to eliminate the old and the infirm."

The conclusion is inescapable: compared to the cannibals, the
dismemberers, and other lesser breeds, Europe and the West are the
incarnation of respect for human dignity.

But let us move on, and quickly, lest our thoughts wander to Algiers,
Morocco, and other places where, as I write these very words, so many
valiant sons of the West, in the semi-darkness of dungeons, are
lavishing upon their inferior African brothers, with such tireless
attention, those authentic marks of respect for human dignity which are
called, in technical terms, "electricity," "the bathtub," and "the
bottleneck."

Let us press on: M. Caillois has not yet reached the end of his list of
outstanding achievements. After scientific superiority and moral
superiority comes religious superiority.

Here, M. Caillois is careful not to let himself be deceived by the empty
prestige of the Orient. Asia, mother of gods, perhaps. Anyway, Europe,
mistress of rites. And see how wonderful: on the one hand-outside of
Europe -ceremonies of the voodoo type, with all their "ludicrous
masquerade, their collective frenzy, their wild alcoholism, their crude
exploitation of a naive fervor," and on the other hand-in Europe-those
authentic values which Chateaubriand was already celebrating in his
_Genie du Christianisme_: "The dogmas and mysteries of the Catholic
religion, its liturgy, the symbolism of its sculptors and the glory of
the plainsong."

Lastly, a final cause for satisfaction:

Gobineau said: "The only history is white." M. Caillois, in turn,
observes: "The only ethnography is white." It is the West that studies
the ethnography of the others, not the others who study the ethnography
of the West.

A cause for the greatest jubilation, is it not?

And the museums of which M. Caillois is so proud, not for one minute
does it cross his.mind that, all things considered, it would have been
better not to have needed them; 16 _Les Carnets de Lucien Levy-Bruhl_,
Presses Universitaires de France, 1949.

- 20 -

that Europe would have done better to tolerate the non-European
civilizations at its side, leaving them alive, dynamic' and prosperous,
whole and not mutilated; that it would have been better to let them
develop and fulfill themselves than to present for our admiration, duly
labeled, their dead and scattered parts; that anyway, the museum by
itself is nothing; that it means nothing, that it can say nothing, when
smug self-satisfaction rots the eyes, when a secret contempt for others
withers the heart, when racism, admitted or not, dries up sympathy; that
it means nothing if its only purpose is to feed the delights of vanity;
that after all, the honest contemporary of Saint Louis, who fought Islam
but respected it, had a better chance of _knowing_ it than do our
contemporaries (even if they have a smattering of ethnographic
literature), who despise it.

No, in the scales of knowledge all the museums in the world will never
weigh so much as one spark of human sympathy.

And what is the conclusion of all that?

Let us be fair; M. Caillois is moderate.

Having established the superiority of the West in all fields, and having
thus re-established a wholesome and extremely valuable hierarchy, M.
Caillois gives an immetate proof of this superiority by concluding that
no one should be exterminated. With him the Negroes are sure that they
will not be lynched, the Jews that they will not feed new bonfires.
There is just one thing: it is important for it to be clearly understood
that the Negroes, Jews, Australians owe this tolerance not to their
respective merits, but to the magnanimity of M. Caillois, not to the
dictates of science, which can offer only ephemeral truths, but to a
decree of M. Caillois' conscience, which can only be absolute; that this
tolerance has no conditions, no guarantees, unless it be M. Caillois'
sense of duty to himself.

Perhaps science will one day declare that the backward cultures and
retarded peoples that constitute so many dead weights and impedimenta on
humanity's path must be cleared away, but we are assured that at the
critical moment the conscience of M. Caillois, transformed on the spot
from a clear conscience into a noble conscience, will arrest the
executioner's arm and pronounce the _salvus sis_. To which we are
indebted for the following juicy note:

For me, the question of the equality of races, peoples, or cultures has
meaning only if we are talking about an equality in law, not an equality
in fact. In the same way, men who are blind, maimed, sick,
feeble-minded, ignorant, or poor [one could hardly be nicer to the
non-Occidentals] are not respectively equal, in the material sense of
the word, to those who are strong, clear-sighted, whole, healthy,
intelligent, cultured, or rich. The latter have greater capacities
which, by the way, do not give them more rights but only more duties…
Similarly, whether for biological or historical reasons, there exist at
present differences in level, power, and value among the various
cultures.

These differences entail an inequality in fact. They in no way justify
an inequality of rights in favor of the so-called superior peoples, as
racism would have it. Rather, they confer upon them additional tasks and
an increased responsibility.

Additional tasks? What are they, if not the tasks of ruling the world?

Increased responsibility? What is it, if not responsibility for the
world?

And Caillois-Atlas charitably plants his feet firmly in the dust and
once again raises to his sturdy shoulders the inevitable white man's
burden.

The reader must excuse me for having talked about M. Caillois at such
length. It is not that I overestimate to any degree whatever the
intrinsic value of his "philosophy" - the

- 21 -

reader will have been able to judge how seriously one should take a
thinker who, while claiming to be dedicated to rigorous logic,
sacrifices so willingly to prejudice and wallows so voluptuously in
cliches. But his views are worth special attention because they are
significant.

Significant of what?

Of the state of mind of thousands upon thousands of Europeans or, to be
very precise, of the state of mind of the Western petty bourgeoisie.

Significant of what?

Of this: that at the very time when it most often mouths the word, the
West has never been further from being able to live a true humanism-a
humanism made to the measure of the world.

One of the values invented by the bourgeoisie in former times and
launched throughout the world was _man_ - and we have seen what has
become of that. The other was the _nation_.

It is a fact: the _nation_ is a bourgeois phenomenon.

Exactly; but if I turn my attention from _man_ to _nations_, I note that
here too there is great danger; that colonial enterprise is to the
modern world what Roman imperialism was to the ancient world: the
prelude to Disaster and the forerunner of Catastrophe. Come, now! The
Indians massacred, the Moslem world drained of itself, the Chinese world
defiled and perverted for a good century; the Negro world disqualified;
mighty voices stilled forever; homes scattered to the wind; all this
wreckage, all this waste, humanity reduced to a monologue, and you think
that all that does not have its price? The truth is that this policy
_cannot but bring about the ruin of Europe itself_, and that Europe, if
it is not careful, will perish from the void it has created around
itself.

They thought they were only slaughtering Indians, or Hndus, or South Sea
islanders, or Africans. They have in fact overthrown, one after another,
the ramparts behind which European civilization could have developed
freely.

I know how fallacious historical parallels are, particularly the one I
am about to draw. Nevertheless, permit me to quote a page from Edgar
Quinet for the not inconsiderable element of truth which it contains and
which is worth pondering.

Here it is:

People ask why barbarism emerged all at once in ancient civilization. I
believe I know the answer. It is surprising that so simple a cause is
not obvious to everyone. The system of ancient civilization was composed
of a certain number of nationalities, of countries which, although they
seemed to be enemies, or were even ignorant of each other, protected,
supported, and guarded one another. When the expanding Roman Empire
undertook to conquer and destroy these groups of nations, the dazzled
sophists thought they saw at the end of this road humanity triumphant in
Rome.

They talked about the unity of the human spirit; it was only a dream. It
happened that these nationalities were so many bulwarks protecting Rome
itself… Thus when Rome, in its alleged triumphal march toward a single
civilization, had destroyed, one after the other, Carthage, Egypt,
Greece, Judea, Persia, Dacia, and Cisalpine and Transalpine Gaul, it
came to pass that it had itself swallowed up the dikes that protected it
against the human ocean under which it was to perish. The magnanimous
Caesar, by crushing the two Gauls, only paved the way for the Teutons.
So many societies, so many languages extinguished, so many cities,
rights, homes annihilated, created a void around Rome, and in those
places which were not invaded by the barbarians, barbarism was born
spontaneously. The vanquished Gauls changed into Bagaudes. Thus the
violent downfall, the progressive extirpation of individual cities,
caused the crumbling of ancient civilization. That social edifice was
supported by the various nationalities as by so many different columns
of marble or porphyry. When, to the applause of the wise men of the
time, each of these living columns had been

- 22 -

demolished, the edifice came crashing down; and the wise men of our day
are still trying to understand how such mighty ruins could have been
made in a moment's time.

And now I ask: what else has bourgeois Europe done? It has undermined
civilizations, destroyed countries, ruined nationalities, extirpated
"the root of diversity." No more dikes, no more bulwarks. The hour of
the barbarian is at hand. The modern barbarian. The American hour.
Violence, excess, waste, mercantilism, bluff, gregariousness, stupidity,
vulgarity, disorder.

In 1913, Ambassador Page wrote to Wilson:

"The future of the world belongs to us. . . . Now what are we going to
do with the leadership of the world presently when it clearly falls into
our hands?"

And in 1914: "What are we going to do with this England and this Empire,
presently, when economic forces unmistakably put the leadership of the
race in our hands?"

This Empire… And the others…

And indeed, do you not see how ostentatiously these gentlemen have just
unfurled the banner of anti-colonialism?

" _Aid to the disinherited countries_," says Truman. "The time of the
old colonialism has passed." That's also Truman.

Which means that American high finance considers that the time has come
to raid every colony in the world. So, dear friends, here you have to be
careful!

I know that some of you, disgusted with Europe, with all that hideous
mess which you did not witness by choice, are turning - oh! in no great
numbers - toward America and getting used to looking upon that country
as a possible liberator.

"What a godsend" you think.

"The bulldozers! The massive investments of capital! The roads! The
ports!"

"But American racism!"

"So what? European racism in the colonies has inured us to it!"

And there we are, ready to run the great Yankee risk.

So, once again, be careful!

American domination - the only domination from which one never recovers.
I mean from which one never recovers unscarred.

And since you are talking about factories and industries, do you not see
the tremendous factory hysterically spitting out its cinders in the
heart of our forests or deep in the bush, the factory for the production
of lackeys; do you not see the prodigious mechanization, the
mechanization of man; the gigantic rape of everything intimate,
undamaged, undefiled that, despoiled as we are, our human spirit has
still managed to preserve; the machine, yes, have you never seen it, the
machine for crushing, for grinding, for degrading peoples?

So that the danger is immense.

So that unless, in Africa, in the South Sea islands, in Madagascar (that
is, at the gates of South Africa), in the West Indies (that is, at the
gates of America), Western Europe undertakes on its own initiative a
policy of _nationalities_, a new policy founded on respect for peoples
and cultures - nay, more - unless Europe galvanizes the dying cultures
or raises up new ones, unless it becomes the awakener of countries and
civilizations (this being said without taking into account the admirable
resistance of the colonial peoples primarily symbolized at present by
Vietnam, but also by the Africa of the Rassemblement

- 23 -

Democratique Africain), Europe will have deprived itself of its last
chance and, with its own hands, drawn up over itself the pall of mortal
darkness.

Which comes down to saying that the salvation of Europe is not a matter
of a revolution in methods. It is a matter of the Revolution - the one
which, until such time as there is a classless society, will substitute
for the narrow tyranny of a dehumanized bourgeoisie the preponderance of
the only class that still has a universal mission, because it suffers in
its flesh from all the wrongs of history, from all the universal wrongs:
the proletariat.

END

- 24 -


AN INTERVIEW WITH AIMÉ CÉSAIRE

_The following interview with Aimé Césaire was conducted by Haitian poet
and militant Rene Depestre at the_ _Cultural Congress of Havana in 1967.
It first appeared in Poesias, an anthology of Césaire's writings_
_published by Casa de las Americas. It has been translated from the
Spanish by Maro Riofrancos._

RENE DEPESTRE: The critic Lilyan Kesteloot has written that _Return to
My Native_ _Land_ is an autobiographical book. Is this opinion well
founded?

AIMÉ CÉSAIRE: Certainly. It is an autobiographical book, but at the same
time it is a book in which I tried to gain an understanding of myself.
In a certain sense it is closer to the truth than a biography. You must
remember that it is a young person's book: I wrote it just after I had
finished my studies and had come back to Martinique. These were my first
contacts with my country after an absence of ten years, so I really
found myself assaulted by a sea of impressions and images. At the same
time I felt a deep anguish over the prospects for Martinique.

R.D.: How old were you when you wrote the book?

A.C.: I must have been around twenty-six.

R.D.: Nevertheless, what is striking about it is its great maturity.

A.C.: It was my first published work, but actually it contains poems
that I had accumulated, or done progressively. I remember having written
quite a few poems before these.

R.D.: But they have never been published.

A.C.: They haven't been published because I wasn't very happy with them.
The friends to whom I showed them found them interesting, but they
didn't satisfy me.

R.D.: Why?

A.C.: Because I don't think I had found a form that was my own. I was
still under the influence of the French poets. In short, if _Return to
My Native Land_ took the form of a prose poem, it was truly by chance.
Even though I wanted to break with French literary traditions, I did not
actually free myself from them until the moment I decided to turn my
back on poetry. In fact, you could say that I became a poet by
renouncing poetry. Do you see what I mean? Poetry was for me the only
way to break the stranglehold the accepted French form held on me.

R.D.: In her introduction to your selected poems published by Editions
Seghers, Lilyan Kesteloot names Mallarme, Claudel, Rimbaud, and
Lautreamont among the poets who have influenced you.

A.C.: Lautreamont and Rimbaud were a great revelation for many poets of
my generation. I must also say that I don't renounce Claudel. His
poetry, in _Tete d'Or_ for example, made a deep impression on me.

R.D.: There is no doubt that it is great poetry.

A.C.: Yes, truly great poetry, very beautiful. Naturally, there were
many things about Claudel that irritated me, but I have always
considered him a great craftsman with language.

R.D.: Your _Return to My Native Land_ bears the stamp of personal
experience, your experience as a Martinican youth, and it also deals
with the itineraries of the Negro race in the Antilles, where French
influences are not decisive.

- 25 -

A.C.: I don't deny French influences myself. Whether I want to or not,
as a poet I express myself in French, and clearly French literature has
influenced me. But I want to emphasize very strongly that - while using
as a point of departure the elements that French literature gave me - at
the same time I have always strived to create a new language, one
capable of communicating the African heritage. In other words, for me
French was a tool that I wanted to use in developing a new means of
expression. I wanted to create an Antillean French, a black French that,
while still being French, had a black character.

R.D.: Has surrealism been instrumental in your effort to discover this
new French language?

A.C.: I was ready to accept surrealism because I already had advanced on
my own, using as my starting points the same authors that had influenced
the surrealist poets.

Their thinking and mine had common reference points. Surrealism provided
me with what I had been confusedly searching for. I have accepted it
joyfully because in it I have found more of a confirmation than a
revelation. It was a weapon that exploded the French language. It shook
up absolutely everything. This was very important because the
traditional forms - burdensome, overused forms - were crushing me.

R.D.: This was what interested you in the surrealist movement…

A.C.: Surrealism interested me to the extent that it was a liberating
factor.

R.D.: So you were very sensitive to the concept of liberation that
surrealism contained. Surrealism called forth deep and unconscious
forces.

A.C.: Exactly. And my thinking followed these lines: Well then, if I
apply the surrealist approach to my particular situation, I can summon
up these unconscious forces. This, for me, was a call to Africa. I said
to myself: it's true that superficially we are French, we bear the marks
of French customs; we have been branded by Cartesian philosophy, by
French rhetoric; but if we break with all that, if we plumb the depths,
then what we will find is fundamentally black.

R.D.: In other words, it was a process of disalienation.

A.C.: Yes, a process of disalienation, that's how I interpreted
surrealism.

R.D.: That's how surrealism has manifested itself in your work: as an
effort to reclaim your authentic character, and in a way as an effort to
reclaim the African heritage.

A.C.: Absolutely.

R.D.: And as a process of detoxification.

A.C.: A plunge into the depths. It was a plunge into Africa for me.

R.D.: It was a way of emancipating your consciousness.

A.C.: Yes, I felt that beneath the social being would be found a
profound being, over whom all sorts of ancestral layers and alluviums
had been deposited.

R.D.: Now, I would like to go back to the period in your life in Paris
when you collaborated with Leopold Sedar Senghor and Leon Damas on the
small periodical _L'Etudiant noir_. Was this first stage of the
Negritude expressed in _Return to My Native_ _Land_?

A.C.: Yes, it was already Negritude, as we conceived of it then. There
were two tendencies within our group. On the one hand, there were people
from the left, Communists at that time, such as J. Monnerot, E. Lero,
and Rene Menil. They were Communists, and therefore we supported them.
But very soon I had to reproach them - and perhaps I owe this to Senghor
- for being French Communists. There was nothing to

- 26 -

distinguish them either from the French surrealists or from the French
Communists. In other words, their poems were colorless.

R.D.: They were not attempting disalienation.

A.C.: In my opinion they bore the marks of assimilation. At that time
Martinican students assimilated either with the French rightists or with
the French leftists. But it was always a process of assimilation.

R.D.: At bottom what separated you from the Communist Martinican
students at that time was the Negro question.

A.C.: Yes, the Negro question. At that time I criticized the Communists
for forgetting our Negro characteristics. They acted like Communists,
which was all right, but they acted like abstract Communists. I
maintained that the political question could not do away with our
condition as Negroes. We are Negroes, with a great number of historical
peculiarities. I suppose that I must have been influenced by Senghor in
this. At the time I knew absolutely nothing about Africa. Soon afterward
I met Senghor, and he told me a great deal about Africa. He made an
enormous impression on me: I am indebted to him for the revelation of
Africa and African singularity. And I tried to develop a theory to
encompass all of my reality.

R.D.: You have tried to particularize Communism…

A.C.: Yes, it is a very old tendency of mine. Even then Communists would
reproach me for speaking of the Negro problem - they called it my
racism. But I would answer: Marx is all right, but we need to complete
Marx. I felt that the emancipation of the Negro consisted of more than
just a political emancipation.

R.D.: Do you see a relationship among the movements between the two
world wars connected to _L'Etudiant noir_, the Negro Renaissance
Movement in the United States, _La_ _Revue indigene_ in Haiti, and
_Negrismo_ in Cuba?

A.C.: I was not influenced by those other movements because I did not
know of them, But I'm sure they are parallel movements.

R.D.: How do you explain the emergence, in the years between the two
world wars, of these parallel movements - in Haiti, the United States,
Cuba, Brazil, Martinique, etc. - that recognized the cultural
particularities of Africa?

A.C.: I believe that at that time in the history of the world there was
a coming to consciousness among Negroes, and this manifested itself in
movements that had no relationship to each other.

R.D.: There was the extraordinary phenomenon of jazz.

A.C.: Yes, there was the phenomenon of jazz. There was the Marcus Garvey
movement. I remember very well that even when I was a child I had heard
people speak of Garvey.

R.D.: Marcus Garvey was a sort of Negro prophet whose speeches had
galvanized the Negro masses of the United States. His objective was to
take all the American Negroes to Africa.

A.C.: He inspired a mass movement, and for several years he was a symbol
to American Negroes. In France there was a newspaper called _Le Cri des
negres_.

R.D.: I believe that Haitians like Dr. Sajous, Jacques Roumain, and Jean
Price-Mars collaborated on that newspaper. There were also six issues of
_La Revue du monde_ _noir_, written by Rene Maran, Claude McKay,
Price-Mars, the Achille brothers, Sajous, and others.

- 27 -

A.C.: I remember very well that around that time we read the poems of
Langston Hughes and Claude McKay. I knew very well who McKay was because
in 1929 or 1930 an anthology of American Negro poetry appeared in Paris.
And McKay's novel, _Banjo_ - describing the life of dock workers in
Marseilles - was published in 1930. This was really one of the first
works in which an author spoke of the Negro and gave him a certain
literary dignity. I must say, therefore, that although I was not
directly influenced by any American Negroes, at least I felt that the
movement in the United States created an atmosphere that was
indispensable for a very clear coming to consciousness. During the
1920's and 1930's I came under three main influences, roughly speaking.
The first was the French literary influence, through the works of
Mallarme, Rimbaud, Lautreamont, and Claudel. The second was Africa. I
knew very little about Africa, but I deepened my knowledge through
ethnographic studies.

R.D.: I believe that European ethnographers have made a contribution to
the development of the concept of Negritude.

A.C.: Certainly. And as for the third influence, it was the Negro
Renaissance Movement in the United States, which did not influence me
directly but still created an atmosphere which allowed me to become
conscious of the solidarity of the black world.

R.D.: At that time you were not aware, for example, of developments
along the same lines in Haiti, centered around _La Revue indigene_ and
Jean Price-Mars' book, _Ainsi_ _parla l'oncle_.

A.C.: No, it was only later that I discovered the Haitian movement and
Price-Mars' famous book.

R.D.: How would you describe your encounter with Senghor, the encounter
between Antillean Negritude and African Negritude? Was it the result of
a particular event or of a parallel development of consciousness?

A.C.: It was simply that in Paris at that time there were a few dozen
Negroes of diverse origins. There were Africans, like Senghor, Guianans,
Haitians, North Americans, Antilleans, etc. This was very important for
me.

R.D.: In this circle of Negroes in Paris, was there a consciousness of
the importance of African culture?

A.C.: Yes, as well as an awareness of the solidarity among blacks. We
had come from different parts of the world. It was our first meeting. We
were discovering ourselves. This was very important.

R.D.: It was extraordinarily important. How did you come to develop the
concept of Negritude?

A.C.: I have a feeling that it was somewhat of a collective creation. I
used the term first, that's true. But it's possible we talked about it
in our group. It was really a resistance to the politics of
assimilation. Until that time, until my generation, the French and the
English but especially the French-had followed the politics of
assimilation unrestrainedly. We didn't know what Africa was. Europeans
despised everything about Africa, and in France people spoke of a
civilized world and a barbarian world. The barbarian world was Africa,
and the civilized world was Europe. Therefore the best thing one could
do with an African was to assimilate him: the ideal was to turn him into
a Frenchman with black skin.

R.D.: Haiti experienced a similar phenomenon at the beginning of the
nineteenth century. There is an .entire Haitian pseudo-literature,
created by authors who allowed themselves to be assimilated. The
independence of Haiti, our first independence, was a

- 28 -

violent attack against the French presence in our country, but our first
authors did not attack French cultural values with equal force. They did
not proceed toward a decolonization of their consciousness.

A.C.: This is what is known as _bovarisme_. In Martinique also we were
in the midst of _bovarisme_. I still remember a poor little Martinican
pharmacist who passed the time writing poems and sonnets which he sent
to literary contests, such as the Floral Games of Toulouse. He felt very
proud when one of his poems won a prize. One day he told me that the
judges hadn't even realized that his poems were written by a man of
color. To put it in other words, his poetry was so impersonal that it
made him proud. He was filled with pride by something I would have
considered a crushing condemnation.

R.D.: It was a case of total alienation.

A.C.: I think you've put your finger on it. Our struggle was a struggle
against alienation. That struggle gave birth to Negritude. Because
Antilleans were ashamed of being Negroes, they searched for all sorts of
euphemisms for Negro: they would say a man of color, a dark-complexioned
man, and other idiocies like that.

R.D.: Yes, real idiocies.

A.C.: That's when we adopted the word _negre_, as a term of defiance. It
was a defiant name. To some extent it was a reaction of enraged youth.
Since there was shame about the word _negre_, we chose the word _negre_.
I must say that when we founded _L'Etudiant noir_, I really wanted to
call it _L'Etudiant negre_, but there was a great resistance to that
among the Antilleans.

R.D.: Some thought that the word _negre_ was offensive.

A.C.: Yes, too offensive, too aggressive, and then I took the liberty of
speaking of _negritude_. There was in us a defiant will, and we found a
violent affirmation in the words _negre_ and _negritude_.

R.D.: In _Return to My Native Land_ you have stated that Haiti was the
cradle of Negritude. In your words, "Haiti, where Negritude stood ' on
its feet for the first time." Then, in, your opinion, the history of our
country is in a certain sense the prehistory of Negritude. How have you
applied the concept of Negritude to the history of Haiti?

A.C.: Well, after my discovery of the North American Negro and my
discovery of Africa, I went on to explore the totality of the black
world, and that is how I came upon the history of Haiti. I love
Martinique, but it is an alienated land, while Haiti represented for me
the heroic Antilles, the African Antilles. I began to make connections
between the Antilles and Africa, and Haiti is the most African of the
Antilles. It is at the same time a country with a marvelous history: the
first Negro epic of the New World was written by Haitians, people like
Toussaint l'Ouverture, Henri Christophe, Jean-Jacques Dessalines, etc.
Haiti is not very well known in Martinique. I am one of the few
Martinicans who know and love Haiti.

R.D.: Then for you the first independence struggle in Haiti was a
confirmation, a demonstration of the concept of Negritude. Our national
history is Negritude in action.

A.C.: Yes, Negritude in action.. Haiti is the country where Negro people
stood up for the first time, affirming their determination to shape a
new world, a free world.

R.D.: During all of the nineteenth century there were men in Haiti who,
without using the term Negritude, understood the significance of Haiti
for world history. Haitian authors, such as Hannibal Price and
Louis-Joseph Janvier, were already speaking of the need to reclaim black
cultural and aesthetic values. A genius like Antenor Firmin wrote in

- 29 -

Paris a book entitled _De l'egalite des races humaines_, in which he
tried to re-evaluate African culture in Haiti in order to combat the
total and colorless assimilation that was characteristic of our early
authors. You could say that beginning with the second half of the
nineteenth century some Haitian authors - Justin Lherisson, Frederic
Marcelin, Fernand Hibbert, and Antoine Innocent - began to discover the
peculiarities of our country, the fact that we had an African past, that
the slave was not born yesterday, that voodoo was an important element
in the development of our national culture. Now it is necessary to
examine the concept of Negritude more closely. Negritude has lived
through all kind of adventures. I don't believe that this concept is
always understood in its original sense, with its explosive nature. In
fact, there are people today in Paris and other places whose objectives
are very different from those of _Return to My Native Land_.

A.C.: I would like to say that everyone has his own Negritude. There has
been too much theorizing about Negritude. I have tried not to overdo it,
out of a sense of modesty. But if someone asks me what my conception of
Negritude is, I answer that above all it is a concrete rather than an
abstract coming to consciousness. What I have been telling you about-the
atmosphere in which we lived, an atmosphere of assimilation in which
Negro people were ashamed of themselves-has great importance. We lived
in an atmosphere of rejection, and we developed an inferiority complex.
I have always thought that the black man was searching for his identity.
And it has seemed to me that if what we want is to establish this
identity, then we must have a concrete consciousness of what we are -
that is, of the first fact of our lives: that we are black; that we were
black and have a history, a history that contains certain cultural
elements of great value; and that Negroes were not, as you put it, born
yesterday, because there have been beautiful and important black
civilizations. At the time we began to write people could write a
history of world civilization without devoting a single chapter to
Africa, as if Africa had made no contributions to the world. Therefore
we affirmed that we were Negroes and that we were proud of it, and that
we thought that Africa was not some sort of blank page in the history of
humanity; in sum, we asserted that our Negro heritage was worthy of
respect, and that this heritage was not relegated to the past, that its
values were values that could still make an important contribution to
the world.

R.D.: That is to say, universalizing values…

A.C.: Universalizing, living values that had not been exhausted. The
field was not dried up: it could still bear fruit, if we made the effort
to irrigate it with our sweat and plant new seeds in it. So this was the
situation: there were things to tell the world. We were not dazzled by
European civilization. We bore the imprint of European civilization but
we thought that Africa could' make a contribution to Europe. It was also
an affirmation of our solidarity. That's the way it was: I have always
recognized that what was happening to my brothers in Algeria and the
United States had its repercussions in me. I understood that I could not
be indifferent to what was happening in Haiti or Africa. Then, in a way,
we slowly came to the idea of a sort of black civilization spread
throughout the world. And I have come to the realization that there was
a "Negro situation" that existed in different geographical areas, that
Africa was also my country. There was the African continent, the
Antilles, Haiti; there were Martinicans and Brazilian Negroes, etc.
That's what Negritude meant to me.

R.D.: There has also been a movement that predated Negritude itself-I'm
speaking of the Negritude movement between the two world wars-a movement
you could call pre-

- 30 -

Negritude, manifested by the interest in African art that could be seen
among European painters. Do you see a relationship between the interest
of European artists and the coming to consciousness of Negroes?

A.C.: Certainly. This movement is another factor in the development of
our consciousness. Negroes were made fashionable in France by Picasso,
Vlaminck, Braque, etc.

R.D.: During the same period, art lovers and art historians - for
example Paul Guillaume in France and Carl Einstein in Germany-were quite
impressed by the quality of African sculpture. African art ceased to be
an exotic curiosity, and Guillaume himself came to appreciate it as the
"life-giving sperm of the twentieth century of the spirit."

A.C.: I also remember the _Negro Anthology_ of Blaise Cendrars.

RD.: It was a book devoted to the oral literature of African Negroes. I
can also remember the third issue of the art journal _Action_, which had
a number of articles by the artistic vanguard of that time on African
masks, sculptures, and other art objects. And we shouldn't forget
Guillaume Apollinaire, whose poetry is full of evocations of Africa. To
sum up, do you think that the concept of Negritude was formed on the
basis of shared ideological and political beliefs on the part of its
proponents? Your comrades in Negritude, the first militants of
Negritude, have followed a different path from you. There is, for
example, Senghor, a brilliant intellect and a fiery poet, but full of,
contradictions on the subject of Negritude.

A.C.: Our affinities were above all a matter of feeling. You either felt
black or did not feel black. But there was also the political aspect.
Negritude was, after all, part of the left. I never thought for a moment
that our emancipation could come from the right - that's impossible. We
both felt, Senghor and I, that our liberation placed us on the left, but
both of us refused to see the black question as simply a social
question. There are people, even today, who thought and still think that
it is all simply a matter of the left taking power in France, that with
a change in the economic conditions the black question will disappear. I
have never agreed with that at all. I think that the economic question
is important, but it is not the only thing.

R.D.: Certainly, because the relationships between consciousness and
reality are extremely complex. That's why it is equally necessary to
decolonize our minds, our inner life, at the same time that we
decolonize society.

A.C.: Exactly, and I remember very well having said to the Martinican
Communists, in those days, that black people, as you have pointed out,
were doubly proletarianized and alienated: in the first place as
workers, but also as blacks, because after all we are dealing with the
only race which is denied even the notion of humanity.

END

- 31 -


Table of Contents

-   Contents
-   Discourse on Colonialism
-   An Interview with Aimé Césaire
